Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-201
Constitutional amendments; proposal by Legislature; resolution.

Amendments to the Constitution may be proposed by resolution of the Legislature, and if the same shall be voted for by three-fifths of the members thereof, in the manner provided by Article XVI, section 1, of the Constitution, the amendment or amendments proposed shall be submitted to the electors of this state for approval or rejection in the manner hereinafter provided.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 114;

R.S.1913, § 3698;

C.S.1922, § 3086;

Laws 1925, c. 112, § 1, p. 303;

C.S.1929, § 49-201;

R.S.1943, § 49-201.

Because of insufficient publication of notice, attempted constitutional amendment, to exclude schools of deaf and blind from jurisdiction of Board of Control, was ineffective. State ex rel Hall v. Cline, 118 Neb. 150, 224 N.W. 6 (1929).